Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1017
Project, defined.

Project means the
acquisition, including the acquisition of real estate by a leasehold interest
with a minimum term of ten years, construction, and equipping of a tourism
attraction or redevelopment project; the construction and installation of
improvements to facilities necessary or desirable for the acquisition, construction,
and installation of a tourism attraction or redevelopment project, including,
but not limited to, surveys; installation of utilities which may include water,
sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electricity, communications, and similar facilities;
and offsite construction of utility extensions to the boundaries of the real
estate on which the facilities are located, all of which are to be used to
improve the economic situation of the approved company in a manner that allows
the approved company to attract persons.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 17.